District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-914

Voting — Proxy prohibited.

Repealed.

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 484, ch. 397, § 14
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-914.
1981 Ed., § 29-1114.
1973 Ed., § 29-814.